DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&HYDRAULIC BRAKE BOOSTERPOWER DI-395
SUPPLY SYSTEM

DI29F-08

ABS Warning Light Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

If the ECU detects trouble, it lights the ABS warning light while at the same time prohibiting ABS control. At
this time, the ECU records a DTC in memory.

After removingthe short pin ofthe check connector, connectterminals Tcand E ] ofthe check connectorto
make the ABS warning light blink and output the DTC.
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DI-396 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & HYDRAULIC BRAKE BOOSTER POWER
SUPPLY SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Troubleshoot in accordance with the chart below for each trouble symptom.

ABS warning light does not light up *1

ABS warning light remains on *2
*1: Start the inspection from step 1 in case of using the hand-held tester and start from step 1 in case of
not using hand-held tester.

*2: After inspection of step 4, start the inspection from step 5 in case of using the hand-held tester and start
from step 4 in case of not using hand-held tester.

1 Check operation of the ABS warning light.

PREPARATION:

(@ Connect the hand-held tester to the DLCS.

(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand-held tester main switch ON.

(c) Selectthe ACTIVE TEST mode on the hand-held tester.

CHECK:

Check that "ON” of the ABS warning light can be shown on the combination meter using the hand-held tes-
ter.

HINT:

ABS warning light turns "OFF” automatically 2 seconds after it is turnd "ON”.

@

2 | Check ABS warning light.

OK> Check and replace ECU.

See combination meter troubleshooting on page BE-2.

NG> Repair bulb or combination meter assembly.
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SUPPLY SYSTEM

3 | Check ABS solenoid relay.
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PREPARATION:

Remove ABS solenoid relay from Engine Room R/B No. 2.
CHECK:

Check continuity between each terminal of ABS solenoid relay.
OK:

Terminals 4 and 6 Continuity (Reference value 80 Q)
Terminals 2 and 3 Continuity
Terminals 1 and 3 Open

CHECK:

(@) Apply battery voltage between terminals 4 and 6.
(b)  Check continuity between each terminal of ABS solenoid

relay.
OK:
Terminals 2 and 3 Open
Terminals 1 and 3 Continuity
CHECK:

Connectthe @ test lead to terminal 5 and the & lead to terminal
3. Check continuity between the terminals.
OK:

Continuity
If there is no continuity, connect the © test lead to terminal 5
and the @ lead to terminal 3. Recheck continuity between ter-
minals.

NG> Replace ABS solenoid relay.

Repair or replace and check for open circuit in harness and connector between check connector
and ABS solenoid relay and body ground (See page IN-24).

LAND CRUISER (W/G)

(RM616E)



DI-398

DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & HYDRAULIC BRAKE BOOSTER POWER

SUPPLY SYSTEM
4 | Check that the ECU connectors are securely connected to the ECU.
NO> Connect the connector to the ECU.
YES
5 [ Check operation of the ABS warning light (See step 1).

ox )

Check and replace ABS ECU.

e ]

6

Is DTC output?

Check DTC on page DI-312.

YES>

Repair circuit indicated by the output code.

@

7 | Does ABS warning light go off if short pin is removed?

NO Check for short circuit in harness and connec-
tor between warning light and check connector
and ECU (See page IN-24).

YES
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8 [ Check ABS solenoid relay (See step 3).

NG> Replace ABS solenoid relay.

OK

Check for short circuit in harness and connector between check connector and ABS solenoid
relay (See page IN-24).
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